Vermont, session 2025-2026, S158.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) It was the stated intention of the framers of the Constitution of the
United States of America that Congress should be “dependent on the people
alone” (James Madison or Alexander Hamilton, Federalist 52). That
dependency has evolved from a dependency on the people alone to a
dependency on those who spend excessively in elections through campaigns or
third-party groups—the result of the U.S. Supreme Court ruling in Citizens
United v. Federal Election Commission, 130 S.Ct. 876 (2010). Citizens United
removed restrictions on independent political spending, resulting in a legally
VT LEG #382780 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.158
2025 Page 2 of 8
permissible, but undue, influence of powerful economic forces on our elections
that has supplanted the will of the people by undermining our ability to choose
our political leadership, write our own laws, and determine the fate of our
State.
(b) Accompanying this spending is the equally problematic acceptance of
contributions by these independent entities that, funneled through a now-
sanctioned process, nevertheless results in the impairment of a candidate—and
eventual officer—in the candidate’s duty to not advantage the contributor in a
manner inconsistent with that duty and the rights of Vermonters. The guise of
uncoordinated activities between a candidate and a monied interest fails to
prevent this corruption.
(c) While the U.S. Supreme Court ruling in Citizens United invalidates
restrictions on independent expenditures, the issue of whether limitations may
be placed on contributions to independent expenditure-only political
committees remains unsettled law so long as the Second Circuit Court or the
United States Supreme Court have not directly decided on the matter.
(d) It is indeed the purpose of this act to amend the State’s campaign
finance laws to place limitations on contributions accepted by independent
expenditure-only political committees.
(e) The State has a sufficiently important interest in limiting corruption in
our political system and asserts a substantial relation between the limitation of
VT LEG #382780 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.158
2025 Page 3 of 8
contributions to independent expenditure-only political committees and the
anticorruption efforts of the State.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2901 is amended to read:
§ 2901. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4) “Contribution” means a payment, distribution, advance, deposit,
loan, or gift of money or anything of value, paid or promised to be paid for the
purpose of influencing an election, advocating a position on a public question,
or supporting or opposing one or more candidates in any election. As used in
this chapter, “contribution” shall does not include any of the following:
(A) a personal loan of money to a candidate from a lending
institution made in the ordinary course of business;
(B) services provided without compensation by individuals
volunteering their time on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or
political party;
(C) unreimbursed travel expenses paid for by an individual for
himself or herself themselves who volunteers personal services to a candidate;
(D) unreimbursed campaign-related travel expenses paid for by the
candidate or the candidate’s spouse;
VT LEG #382780 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.158
2025 Page 4 of 8
(E) the use by a candidate or volunteer of his or her the candidate’s or
volunteer’s own personal property, including offices, telephones, computers,
and similar equipment;
(F) the use of a political party’s offices, telephones, computers, and
similar equipment;
(G) the payment by a political party of the costs of preparation,
display, or mailing or other distribution of a party candidate listing;
(H) documents, in printed or electronic form, including party
platforms, single copies of issue papers, information pertaining to the
requirements of this title, lists of registered voters, and voter identification
information created, obtained, or maintained by a political party for the general
purpose of party building and provided to a candidate who is a member of that
party or to another political party;
(I) compensation paid by a political party to its employees whose job
responsibilities are not for the specific and exclusive benefit of a single
candidate in any election;
(J) compensation paid by a political party to its employees or
consultants for the purpose of providing assistance to another political party;
(K) campaign training sessions provided to three or more candidates;
(L) costs paid for by a political party in connection with a campaign
event at which three or more candidates are present; or
VT LEG #382780 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.158
2025 Page 5 of 8
(M) activity or communication designed to encourage individuals to
register to vote or to vote if that activity or communication does not mention or
depict a clearly identified candidate.
* * *
(10) “Independent expenditure-only political committee” means a
political committee that conducts its activities entirely independent of
candidates; does not give contributions to candidates, political committees, or
political parties; does not make related expenditures; and is not closely related
to a political party or to a political committee that makes contributions to
candidates or makes related expenditures.
* * *
(13) “Political committee” or “political action committee” means any
formal or informal committee of two or more individuals or a corporation,
labor organization, public interest group, or other entity, not including a
political party, that accepts contributions of $1,000.00 or more and makes
expenditures of $1,000.00 or more in any two-year general election cycle for
the purpose of supporting or opposing one or more candidates, influencing an
election, or advocating a position on a public question in any election, and
includes an independent expenditure-only political committee and a legislative
leadership political committee.
* * *
VT LEG #382780 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.158
2025 Page 6 of 8
(16) “Single source” means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons
that is not a political committee or political party.
* * *
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. § 2941 is amended to read:
§ 2941. LIMITATIONS OF CONTRIBUTIONS
(a) In any election cycle:
(1)(A) A candidate for State Representative or for local office shall not
accept contributions totaling more than:
(i) $1,000.00 from a single source; or
(ii) $1,000.00 from a political committee.
(B) Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a
political party.
(2)(A) A candidate for State Senator or for county office shall not accept
contributions totaling more than:
(i) $1,500.00 from a single source; or
(ii) $1,500.00 from a political committee.
(B) Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a
political party.
VT LEG #382780 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.158
2025 Page 7 of 8
(3)(A) A candidate for the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor,
Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Accounts, or Attorney General
shall not accept contributions totaling more than:
(i) $4,000.00 from a single source; or
(ii) $4,000.00 from a political committee.
(B) Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a
political party.
(4) A political committee shall not accept contributions totaling more
than:
(A) $4,000.00 from a single source;
(B) $4,000.00 from a political committee; or
(C) $4,000.00 from a political party.
(5) A political party shall not accept contributions totaling more than:
(A) $10,000.00 from a single source;
(B) $10,000.00 from a political committee; or
(C) $60,000.00 from a political party.
(6) An independent expenditure-only political committee shall not
accept contributions totaling more than:
(A) $5,000.00 from a single source;
(B) $5,000.00 from a political committee; or
(C) $5,000.00 from a political party.
VT LEG #382780 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.158
2025 Page 8 of 8
(b) A single source, political committee, or political party shall not
contribute more to a candidate, political committee, or political party than the
candidate, political committee, or political party is permitted to accept under
this section.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #382780 v.1